Nebraska, session 109, LB632.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB632 LB632
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) The Legislature declares that the purpose of this
section is to protect the public health and welfare and to encourage and
express respect for the dignity of unborn children by providing that
health care facilities performing elective abortions provide for the
dignified and safe disposition of the remains of aborted unborn children.
(2) For purposes of this section, remains of an aborted unborn child
means the physical remains of an unborn child at any stage of gestation
whose life has been terminated by an elective abortion.
(3) It shall be unlawful for a health care facility at which an
elective abortion has been performed to deposit or dispose of the remains
of an aborted unborn child in a manner other than provided in this
section.
(4) A health care facility at which an elective abortion has been
performed shall provide for the individual disposition of the remains of
the aborted unborn child by cremation or interment by burial or, if not
possible, as directed by the Board of Health.
(5) No notice of the method of disposition shall be required to be
given to a woman upon whom an abortion was performed.
-2-